Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ast_ES.aff
SFX H   oser  osáis       oser               # cosáis
SFX H   oser  uesan       oser               # cuesan
SFX H   oser  osiera      oser               # cosiera
SFX H   oser  osiere      oser               # cosiere
SFX H   oser  osieras     oser               # cosieras
SFX H   oser  osieres     oser               # cosieres
SFX H   oser  osiéramos   oser               # cosiéramos
SFX H   oser  osiéremos   oser               # cosiéremos
SFX H   oser  osierais    oser               # cosierais
SFX H   oser  osiereis    oser               # cosiereis
SFX H   oser  osieran     oser               # cosieran
SFX H   oser  osieren     oser               # cosieren
SFX H   0     é           oser               # coseré
SFX H   0     ás          oser               # coserás
SFX H   0     á           oser               # coserá
SFX H   0     emos        oser               # coseremos
SFX H   0     éis         oser               # coseréis
SFX H   0     án          oser               # coserán
SFX H   0     ía          oser               # cosería
SFX H   0     íes         oser               # coseríes
SFX H   0     íamos       oser               # coseríamos
SFX H   0     íemos       oser               # coseríemos
SFX H   0     íais        oser               # coseríais
SFX H   0     íeis        oser               # coseríeis
SFX H   0     íen         oser               # coseríen
SFX H   oser  uesi        oser               # cuesi
SFX H   er    i           oser               # cosi
SFX H   er    éi          oser               # coséi
SFX H   er    iendo       oser               # cosiendo
SFX H   er    ío          oser               # cosío
SFX H   er    ida         oser               # cosida
SFX H   er    íu          oser               # cosíu
SFX H   er    íos         oser               # cosíos
SFX H   er    íes         oser               # cosíes
SFX H   oyer  ueyo        oyer               # cueyo
SFX H   oyer  ueyes       oyer               # cueyes
SFX H   oyer  ueye        oyer               # cueye
SFX H   oyer  oyemos      oyer               # coyemos
SFX H   oyer  oyéis       oyer               # coyéis
SFX H   oyer  ueyen       oyer               # cueyen
SFX H   oyer  oyía        oyer               # coyía
SFX H   oyer  oyíes       oyer               # coyíes
SFX H   oyer  oyíamos     oyer               # coyíamos
SFX H   oyer  oyíemos     oyer               # coyíemos
SFX H   oyer  oyíais      oyer               # coyíais
SFX H   oyer  oyíeis      oyer               # coyíeis
SFX H   oyer  oyíen       oyer               # coyíen
SFX H   oyer  oyí         oyer               # coyí
SFX H   oyer  oyisti      oyer               # coyisti
SFX H   oyer  oyesti      oyer               # coyesti
SFX H   oyer  oyó         oyer               # coyó
SFX H   oyer  oyimos      oyer               # coyimos
SFX H   oyer  oyistis     oyer               # coyistis
SFX H   oyer  oyestis     oyer               # coyestis
SFX H   oyer  oyeron      oyer               # coyeron
SFX H   oyer  ueya        oyer               # cueya
SFX H   oyer  ueyas       oyer               # cueyas
SFX H   oyer  oyamos      oyer               # coyamos
SFX H   oyer  oyáis       oyer               # coyáis
SFX H   oyer  ueyan       oyer               # cueyan
SFX H   0     a           oyer               # coyera
SFX H   0     e           oyer               # coyere
SFX H   0     as          oyer               # coyeras
SFX H   0     es          oyer               # coyeres
SFX H   er    éramos      oyer               # coyéramos
SFX H   er    éremos      oyer               # coyéremos
SFX H   0     ais         oyer               # coyerais
SFX H   0     eis         oyer               # coyereis
SFX H   0     an          oyer               # coyeran
SFX H   0     en          oyer               # coyeren
SFX H   oyer  ueyi        oyer               # cueyi
SFX H   er    i           oyer               # coyi
SFX H   er    éi          oyer               # coyéi
SFX H   er    endo        oyer               # coyendo
SFX H   er    ío          oyer               # coyío
SFX H   er    ida         oyer               # coyida
SFX H   er    íu          oyer               # coyíu
SFX H   er    íos         oyer               # coyíos
SFX H   er    íes         oyer               # coyíes
SFX H   0     é           oyer               # coyeré
SFX H   0     ás          oyer               # coyerás
SFX H   0     á           oyer               # coyerá
SFX H   0     emos        oyer               # coyeremos
SFX H   0     éis         oyer               # coyeréis
SFX H   0     án          oyer               # coyerán
SFX H   0     ía          oyer               # coyería
SFX H   0     íes         oyer               # coyeríes
SFX H   0     íamos       oyer               # coyeríamos
SFX H   0     íemos       oyer               # coyeríemos
SFX H   0     íais        oyer               # coyeríais
SFX H   0     íeis        oyer               # coyeríeis
SFX H   0     íen         oyer               # coyeríen
SFX H   ayer  ayo         trayer             # trayo
SFX H   ayer  ayes        trayer             # trayes
SFX H   ayer  aye         trayer             # traye
SFX H   ayer  ayemos      trayer             # trayemos
SFX H   ayer  ayéis       trayer             # trayéis
SFX H   ayer  ayen        trayer             # trayen
SFX H   ayer  aigo        trayer             # traigo
SFX H   ayer  aes         trayer             # traes
SFX H   ayer  ái          [aens]trayer       # distrái
SFX H   ayer  aemos       trayer             # traemos
SFX H   ayer  aéis        trayer             # traéis
SFX H   ayer  aen         trayer             # traen
SFX H   ayer  ayía        trayer             # trayía
SFX H   ayer  ayíes       trayer             # trayíes
SFX H   ayer  ayíamos     trayer             # trayíamos
SFX H   ayer  ayíemos     trayer             # trayíemos
SFX H   ayer  ayíais      trayer             # trayíais
SFX H   ayer  ayíeis      trayer             # trayíeis
SFX H   ayer  ayíen       trayer             # trayíen
SFX H   ayer  aía         trayer             # traía
SFX H   ayer  aíes        trayer             # traíes
SFX H   ayer  aíamos      trayer             # traíamos
SFX H   ayer  aíemos      trayer             # traíemos
SFX H   ayer  aíais       trayer             # traíais
SFX H   ayer  aíeis       trayer             # traíeis
SFX H   ayer  aíen        trayer             # traíen
SFX H   ayer  axi         trayer             # traxi
SFX H   ayer  axisti      trayer             # traxisti
SFX H   ayer  axesti      trayer             # traxesti
SFX H   ayer  axo         trayer             # traxo
SFX H   ayer  aximos      trayer             # traximos
SFX H   ayer  axemos      trayer             # traxiemos
SFX H   ayer  axistis     trayer             # traxistis
SFX H   ayer  axestis     trayer             # traxestis
SFX H   ayer  axeron      trayer             # traxeron
SFX H   ayer  aya         trayer             # traya
SFX H   ayer  ayas        trayer             # trayas
SFX H   ayer  ayamos      trayer             # trayamos
SFX H   ayer  ayáis       trayer             # trayáis
SFX H   ayer  ayan        trayer             # trayan
SFX H   ayer  aiga        trayer             # traiga
SFX H   ayer  aigas       trayer             # traigas
SFX H   ayer  aigamos     trayer             # traigamos
SFX H   ayer  aigáis      trayer             # traigáis
SFX H   ayer  aigan       trayer             # traigan
SFX H   ayer  axera       trayer             # traxera
SFX H   ayer  axere       trayer             # traxere
SFX H   ayer  axeras      trayer             # traxeras
SFX H   ayer  axeres      trayer             # traxeres
SFX H   ayer  axéramos    trayer             # traxéramos
SFX H   ayer  axéremos    trayer             # traxéremos
SFX H   ayer  axerais     trayer             # traxerais
SFX H   ayer  axereis     trayer             # traxereis
